Mississippi, session 2026, HB1634.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  Section 43-12-19, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 43-12-19.  Work requirements.  (1)  The Department of Human Services shall not seek, apply for, accept or renew any waiver of requirements established under 7 USC Section 2015(o), except during a formal state or federal declaration of a natural disaster. (2)  Unless prohibited by federal law or regulation, the  Department of Human Services shall require a person who is receiving Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program (SNAP) benefits who:  (a) is at least eighteen (18) but not more than fifty-nine (59) years of age; (b) does not have children under eighteen (18) years of age in his or her home; (c) does not qualify for an exemption; and (d) is determined by the department to be eligible, to participate in an employment and training program, as provided in 7 USC Section 2015(d). SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.